src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuj_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
  
  Noun - туй: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm 'road / tie / дорога'
     туй+N+Sg+Nom: туй
     туй+N+Sg+Acc: [туй, туйӧс]
     туй+N+Sg+Gen: туйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl: туйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat: туйлы
     туй+N+Sg+Ins: туйӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Com: туйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car: туйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns: туйла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr: туйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine: туйын
     туй+N+Sg+Ela: туйысь
     туй+N+Sg+Ill: туйӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr: туйлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr: туйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl: туйӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra: туйті
     туй+N+Sg+Ter: туйӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne: туйланьын
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla: туйланьысь
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll: туйланьӧ
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr: туйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl: туйланьӧд
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra: туйланьті
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer: туйланьӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: туйӧй
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: туйӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: туйӧйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: туйӧйлы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: туйӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: туйнам
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: туйӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg1: туйӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: туйӧйла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: туйӧйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: туйсьым
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: туйӧйлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: туйӧйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: туйӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: туйтіым
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: туйӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: туйланьсьым
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: туйӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: туйланьӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg1: туйланьтіым
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg1: туйланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: туйыд
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: туйыдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: туйыдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: туйыдлы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: туйтӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: туйнад
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: туйыдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [туйтӧгыд, туйыдтӧг]
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: туйыдла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: туйсяыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: туйсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: туйланьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [туйсяньыд, туйыдсянь]
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: туйӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: туйтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: туйӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: туйланьсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: туйланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: туйланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg2: туйланьтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg2: туйланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: туйыс
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: туйыслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: туйыслысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: туйыслы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: туйсӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: туйнас
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: туйыскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: туйтӧгыс
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: туйысла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: туйсяыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: туйсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: туйланьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: туйсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: туйӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: туйтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: туйӧдзыс
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: туйланьсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: туйланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: туйланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg3: туйланьтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg3: туйланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: туйным
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: туйнымлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: туйнымлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: туйнымлы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: туйнымӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: туйнаным
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: туйнымкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [туйтӧгным, туйнымтӧг]
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: туйнымла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: туйсяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: туйсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [туйланьным, туйнымлань]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [туйсяньным, туйнымсянь]
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [туйӧдным, туйнымӧд]
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl1: туйтіным
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: туйӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: туйланьсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: туйланьсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: туйланьӧдным
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl1: туйланьтіным
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl1: туйланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: туйныд
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: туйныдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: туйныдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: туйныдлы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: туйнытӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: туйнаныд
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: туйныдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: туйтӧгныд
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: туйныдла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: туйсяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: туйсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [туйныдлань, туйланьныд]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [туйсяньныд, туйныдсянь]
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: туйӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl2: туйтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: туйӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: туйланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: туйланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: туйланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl2: туйланьтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl2: туйланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: туйныс
     туй+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: туйныслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: туйныслысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: туйныслы
     туй+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: туйнысӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: туйнаныс
     туй+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: туйныскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: туйтӧгныс
     туй+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: туйнысла
     туй+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: туйсяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: туйсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [туйныслань, туйланьныс]
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [туйсяньныс, туйныссянь]
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: туйӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl3: туйтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: туйӧдзныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: туйланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: туйланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: туйланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl3: туйланьтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl3: туйланьӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+Nom: туйяс
     туй+N+Pl+Acc: [туйяс, туйясӧс]
     туй+N+Pl+Gen: туйяслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl: туйяслысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat: туйяслы
     туй+N+Pl+Ins: туйясӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Com: туйяскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car: туйястӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns: туйясла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr: туйясся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine: туйясын
     туй+N+Pl+Ela: туйясысь
     туй+N+Pl+Ill: туйясӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr: туйяслань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr: туйяссянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl: туйясӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra: туйясті
     туй+N+Pl+Ter: туйясӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne: туйясланьын
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla: туйясланьысь
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll: туйясланьӧ
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr: туйясланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl: туйясланьӧд
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra: туйясланьті
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer: туйясланьӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: туйясӧй
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: туйясӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: туйясӧйлысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: туйясӧйлы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: туйясӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: туйяснам
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: туйясӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg1: туйясӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: туйясӧйла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: туйясӧйся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: туйясам
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: туйяссьым
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: туйясам
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: туйясӧйлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: туйясӧйсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: туйясӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg1: туйястіым
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: туйясӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: туйясланям
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: туйясланьсьым
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: туйясланям
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: туйясӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: туйясланьӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg1: туйясланьтіым
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg1: туйясланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: туйясыд
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: туйясыдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: туйясыдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: туйясыдлы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: туйястӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: туйяснад
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: туйясыдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [туйястӧгыд, туйясыдтӧг]
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: туйясыдла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: туйяссяыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: туйясад
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: туйяссьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: туйясад
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: туйясланьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [туйяссяньыд, туйясыдсянь]
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: туйясӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: туйястіыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: туйясӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: туйясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: туйясланьсьыд
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: туйясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: туйясланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: туйясланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg2: туйясланьтіыд
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg2: туйясланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: туйясыс
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: туйясыслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: туйясыслысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: туйясыслы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: туйяссӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: туйяснас
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: туйясыскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: туйястӧгыс
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: туйясысла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: туйяссяыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: туйясас
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: туйяссьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: туйясас
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: туйясланьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: туйяссяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: туйясӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: туйястіыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: туйясӧдзыс
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: туйясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: туйясланьсьыс
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: туйясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: туйясланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: туйясланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg3: туйясланьтіыс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg3: туйясланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: туйясным
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: туйяснымлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: туйяснымлысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: туйяснымлы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: туйяснымӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: туйяснаным
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: туйяснымкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [туйястӧгным, туйяснымтӧг]
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: туйяснымла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: туйяссяным
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: туйясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: туйяссьыным
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: туйясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [туйясланьным, туйяснымлань]
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [туйяссяньным, туйяснымсянь]
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [туйясӧдным, туйяснымӧд]
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: туйястіным
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: туйясӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: туйясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: туйясланьсьыным
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: туйясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: туйясланьсяньным
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: туйясланьӧдным
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl1: туйясланьтіным
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl1: туйясланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: туйясныд
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: туйясныдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: туйясныдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: туйясныдлы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: туйяснытӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: туйяснаныд
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: туйясныдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: туйястӧгныд
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: туйясныдла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: туйяссяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: туйясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: туйяссьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: туйясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [туйясныдлань, туйясланьныд]
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [туйяссяньныд, туйясныдсянь]
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: туйясӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: туйястіныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: туйясӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: туйясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: туйясланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: туйясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: туйясланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: туйясланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl2: туйясланьтіныд
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl2: туйясланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: туйясныс
     туй+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: туйясныслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: туйясныслысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: туйясныслы
     туй+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: туйяснысӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: туйяснаныс
